South Dakota, session 2026, HB1065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 34-20G-51 be AMENDED:
34-20G-51. Except as provided in § 34-20G-18 and this section, a person may
assert the medical purpose for using cannabis as a defense to any prosecution involving
cannabis, and such defense is presumed valid where the evidence shows that:
(1) A practitioner has stated that, in the practitioner's professional opinion, after
having completed a full assessment of the person's medical history and current
medical condition made in the course of a bona fide practitioner-patient
relationship, the patient has a debilitating medical condition and the potential
benefits of using cannabis for medical purposes would likely outweigh the health
risks for the person;
(2) The person was in possession of no more than three ounces of cannabis, the
amount of cannabis products allowed by department rules, two flowering cannabis
plants, two cannabis plants that are not flowering, and the cannabis produced by
those plants;
(3) The person was engaged in the acquisition, possession, use, manufacture,
cultivation, or transportation of cannabis, paraphernalia, or both, relating to the
administration of cannabis to treat or alleviate the person's debilitating medical
condition or symptoms associated with the person's debilitating medical condition;
and
(4) Any cultivation of cannabis and storage of more than three ounces of cannabis
occurred in a secure location that only the person asserting the defense could
access
(1) If the person is a:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.529.10 2 1065
(a) Qualifying patient, the person was registered with the department as a
cardholder or nonresident cardholder at the time of the alleged offense; or
(b) Designated caregiver, the person was registered with the department as a
designated caregiver at the time of the alleged offense; and
(2) The conduct underlying the alleged offense complied with this chapter.
Section 2. That § 34-20G-53 be REPEALED.
A person is not required to possess a registry identification card to raise the
affirmative defense set forth in § 34-20G-51.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.